Montana, session 2025, SB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 20-1-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-1-102. Legislative goals for public elementary and secondary schools. It is the goal of the
legislature that Montana's public elementary and secondary school system, in cooperation with parents or
guardians, create a learning environment for each student that:
(1) develops a sound foundation for literacy and numeracy during the early years that is built upon
and reinforced throughout the educational experience;
(2) furthers the ability to reason critically, creatively, and strategically;
(3) fosters the ability to effectively understand and communicate ideas, knowledge, and thoughts;
(4) develops a sense of personal and civic responsibility;
(5) provides an in-depth understanding of the American political, social, and economic systems
and the historical context from which they arose;
(6) provides familiarization with political, social, and economic systems found elsewhere in the
world;
(7) develops a strong work ethic, postsecondary readiness, and employment skills;
(8) encourages a healthy lifestyle; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 107
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 107
(9) supports instruction of financial literacy, where students obtain the knowledge and skills
required to succeed financially; and
(10) supports instruction of avoidance of participation or involvement in and prevention of child sex
trafficking and human trafficking."
Section 2. Section 20-7-1316, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-1316. Child sex trafficking and human trafficking prevention. The office of public instruction
is encouraged to shall undertake activities to educate Montanans about and prevent child sex trafficking and
human trafficking. Activities may include but are not limited to:
(1) reviewing best practices for preventing child sex trafficking and human trafficking;
(2) providing access to educational resources for interested parents, teachers, child-care
providers, and other community members on how to prevent child sex trafficking and human trafficking, on the
warning signs of child sex trafficking and human trafficking, and on predatory behaviors;
(3) coordinating educational and prevention efforts with law enforcement, the department of public
health and human services, and local organizations that work to prevent child sex trafficking and human
trafficking; and
(4) supporting school districts in developing:
(a) policies on child sex trafficking and human trafficking awareness, prevention, response, and
reporting; and
(b) educational materials and curricula aimed at preventing child sex trafficking and human
trafficking."
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 107
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 107, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 107
INTRODUCED BY S. WEBBER, E. BOLDMAN, M. CUFFE, W. CURDY, M. DUNWELL, D. FERN, B.
GILLESPIE, D. HAYMAN, G. HERTZ, E. KERR-CARPENTER, J. MORIGEAU, S. MORIGEAU, C. NEUMANN,
A. OLSEN, C. POPE, J. TREBAS, J. WINDY BOY, T. CROWE, C. FITZPATRICK, M. FOX, T. FRANCE, S.
FYANT, D. HAWK, T. RUNNING WOLF, F. SMITH, J. SOOKTIS
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING EDUCATION LAWS; ESTABLISHING A LEGISLATIVE GOAL FOR PUBLIC
ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOLS TO SUPPORT INSTRUCTION OF PREVENTION AND
AVOIDANCE OF CHILD SEX TRAFFICKING AND HUMAN TRAFFICKING; REQUIRING THE OFFICE OF
PUBLIC INSTRUCTION TO UNDERTAKE ACTIVITIES TO EDUCATE MONTANANS ABOUT AND PREVENT
CHILD SEX TRAFFICKING AND HUMAN TRAFFICKING; AMENDING SECTIONS 20-1-102 AND 20-7-1316,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.